Maryland, session 2025, HB1441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
16.7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “County license” means a license issued by the clerk to sell electronic smoking
devices to consumers in a county.
(c) (1) “Electronic smoking device” means a device that can be used to deliver
aerosolized or vaporized nicotine to an individual inhaling from the device.
(2) “Electronic smoking device” includes:
(i) an electronic cigarette, an electronic cigar, an electronic cigarillo,
an electronic pipe, an electronic hookah, a vape pen, NICOTINE SALTS, and vaping liquid;
and

HOUSE BILL 1441 3
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, any
component, part, CARTRIDGE, TANK, or accessory of such a device regardless of whether
or not it is sold separately, including any substance intended to be aerosolized or vaporized
during use of the device.
(3) “Electronic smoking device” does not include:
(i) a drug, device, or combination product authorized for sale AS A
NICOTINE REPLACEMENT PRODUCT by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(ii) a battery or battery charger when sold separately.
(d) “Electronic smoking devices manufacturer” means a person that:
(1) manufactures, mixes, or otherwise produces electronic smoking devices
intended for sale in the State, including electronic smoking devices intended for sale in the
United States through an importer; and
(2) (i) sells electronic smoking devices to [a consumer, if the consumer
purchases or orders the devices through the mail, a computer network, a telephonic
network, or another electronic network,] a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler
distributor[,] or a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer [in the State];
(ii) if the electronic smoking devices manufacturer also holds a
license to act as an electronic smoking devices retailer or a vape shop vendor, sells electronic
smoking devices in the same manner as a vape shop vendor to consumers located in the
State; or
(iii) unless otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this
article, or the Criminal Law Article, distributes sample electronic smoking devices to a
licensed electronic smoking devices retailer or vape shop vendor.
(e) “Electronic smoking devices retailer” means a person that:
(1) sells electronic smoking devices to consumers;
(2) holds electronic smoking devices for sale to consumers; or
(3) unless otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this article,
the Criminal Law Article, or § 24–305 of the Health – General Article, distributes sample
electronic smoking devices to consumers in the State.
(f) “Electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor” means a person that:

HOUSE BILL 1441
(1) [obtains at least 70% of its electronic smoking devices from a holder of
an electronic smoking devices manufacturer license under this subtitle or a business entity
located in the United States] IS NOT AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
IMPORTER; and
(2) (i) holds electronic smoking devices for sale to another person for
resale; or
(ii) sells electronic smoking devices to another person for resale.
(g) “Electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer” means a person that:
(1) obtains at least 70% of its electronic smoking devices from a [business
entity] LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER located in a
foreign country; and
(2) (i) holds electronic smoking devices for sale to another person for
resale; or
(ii) sells electronic smoking devices to another person for resale.
(h) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Alcohol, Tobacco,
and Cannabis Commission.
(i) “License” means:
(1) a license issued by the Executive Director under § 16.7–203(a) of this
title to:
(i) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices manufacturer;
(ii) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler
distributor; or
(iii) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer;
or
(2) a license issued by the clerk under § 16.7–203(b) of this title to:
(i) act as a licensed electronic smoking devices retailer; or
(ii) act as a licensed vape shop vendor.
(j) “Sell” means to exchange or transfer, or to agree to exchange or transfer, title
or possession of property, in any manner or by any means, for consideration.

HOUSE BILL 1441 5
(k) “Vape shop vendor” means an electronic smoking devices business that sells
electronic smoking devices and related accessories to consumers on the premises of its place
of business.
(l) “Vaping liquid” means a liquid that:
(1) consists of propylene glycol, vegetable glycerin, or other similar
substance;
(2) may or may not contain natural or artificial flavors;
(3) may or may not contain nicotine; and
(4) converts to vapor intended for inhalation when heated in an electronic
device.
16.7–102.
(a) The Executive Director may delegate any power or duty of the Executive
Director under this title.
(b) Any person [licensed under Title 16 or Title 16.5 of this article, or an affiliate,
as defined under § 16–402(c) of this article, of a person licensed under Title 16 of this article:
(1) is authorized to] WHO IS SEEKING TO MANUFACTURE, DISTRIBUTE,
OR SELL ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES IN THE STATE MUST OBTAIN A LICENSE TO
manufacture, distribute, or sell electronic smoking devices pursuant to this title [in the
same capacity as the person is licensed under Title 16 or Title 16.5 of this article; and
(2) may not be required to obtain an additional license under this title].
Subtitle 2. Electronic [Nicotine Delivery Systems] SMOKING DEVICES Licenses.
16.7–201.
(a) A person must hold an appropriate license before the person may act as:
(1) an electronic smoking devices manufacturer;
(2) an electronic smoking devices retailer;
(3) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor;
(4) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer; or
(5) a vape shop vendor.

HOUSE BILL 1441
(b) A place of business in which a person acts as an electronic smoking devices
retailer or a vape shop vendor must hold an appropriate license.
16.7–202.
(a) [(1)] An applicant for a license to act as an electronic smoking devices
manufacturer, electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor, or electronic smoking
devices wholesaler importer shall:
[(i)] (1) obtain an appropriate [county] license by submitting an
application to the Executive Director on the form and containing the information that the
Executive Director requires;
[(ii)] (2) indicate the licenses for which the applicant is applying;
and
[(iii)] (3) [except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection,]
pay to the Executive Director a fee of [$25] $300 for each license for which the applicant
applies.
[(2) An applicant for a license to act as an electronic smoking devices
wholesaler distributor or electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer shall pay to the
Executive Director a fee of $150.]
(b) (1) An applicant for a license to act as an electronic smoking devices
retailer or a vape shop vendor:
(i) shall obtain a county license by submitting to the clerk an
application for each permanent or temporary place of business located in the same
enclosure and operated by the same applicant; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall pay
to the clerk a fee of $300.
(2) The application shall:
(i) be made on the form that the clerk requires; and
(ii) contain the information that the Executive Director requires.
(3) (i) From each license fee collected under this subsection, the clerk
shall distribute:
1. $25 to the Executive Director; and

HOUSE BILL 1441 7
2. $275 to the Maryland Department of Health to be used by
the Department or its designee to enforce existing laws prohibiting the sale or distribution
of tobacco, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices, as defined in § 16.7–101 of this
title, to individuals under the age of 21 years.
(ii) Funds distributed under this subsection may not be used to
supplant existing funding for the enforcement of laws banning the sale or distribution of
tobacco, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices to individuals under the age of 21
years.
(c) A licensee shall display a license in the way that the Executive Director
requires by regulation.
(d) If a person has had a license revoked under § 16.7–207 of this subtitle, the
person may not reapply for a license within 1 year after the date when the prior license was
revoked.
16.7–204.
(a) An electronic smoking devices manufacturer license authorizes the licensee
to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to:
(i) a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler [located in the
State] DISTRIBUTOR; OR
(ii) an electronic smoking devices wholesaler [or retailer located
outside the State if the electronic smoking devices may be sold lawfully in Maryland;
(iii) a licensed vape shop vendor; and
(iv) a consumer if:
1. the licensee manufactured the devices; and
2. the consumer purchases or orders the devices through the
mail, a computer network, a telephonic network, or another electronic network]
IMPORTER;
(2) if the electronic smoking devices manufacturer licensee also holds a
license to act as an electronic smoking devices retailer or a vape shop vendor, transfer
electronic smoking devices to inventory for sale under the retail license or vape shop license;
and

HOUSE BILL 1441
(3) except as otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this article,
or the Criminal Law Article, distribute electronic smoking devices products to a licensed
electronic smoking devices retailer or vape shop vendor.
(b) An electronic smoking devices retailer license authorizes the licensee to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to consumers;
(2) buy electronic smoking devices from [an] A LICENSED electronic
smoking devices wholesaler distributor or LICENSED electronic smoking devices
wholesaler importer;
(3) if the electronic smoking devices retailer licensee also holds a license to
act as an electronic smoking devices manufacturer, sell at retail electronic smoking devices
manufactured under the manufacturer license; and
(4) except as otherwise prohibited or restricted under local law, this article,
the Criminal Law Article, or § 24–305 of the Health – General Article, distribute sample
electronic smoking devices products to consumers in the State.
(c) An electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor license or electronic
smoking devices wholesaler importer license authorizes the licensee to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices to LICENSED electronic smoking devices
retailers and LICENSED vape shop vendors;
(2) buy electronic smoking devices directly from [an] A LICENSED
electronic smoking devices manufacturer [and an], A LICENSED electronic smoking devices
wholesaler distributor, or A LICENSED electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer;
(3) hold electronic smoking devices; and
(4) sell electronic smoking devices to another licensed electronic smoking
devices wholesaler distributor or LICENSED electronic smoking devices wholesaler
importer.
(d) A vape shop vendor license authorizes the licensee to:
(1) sell electronic smoking devices as a vape shop vendor to consumers on
the premises of the licensee’s place of business;
(2) if the vape shop vendor licensee also holds a license to act as an
electronic smoking devices manufacturer, sell at retail on the vape shop vendor premises
electronic smoking devices manufactured under the manufacturer license; and

HOUSE BILL 1441 9
(3) buy electronic smoking devices from [an electronic smoking devices
manufacturer, an] A LICENSED electronic smoking devices wholesaler distributor[,] or
[an] A LICENSED electronic smoking devices wholesaler importer.
16.7–207.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 16.7–208 of this subtitle, the Executive
Director may deny a license to an applicant, reprimand a licensee, or suspend or revoke a
license if the applicant or licensee:
(1) fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license for
the applicant, licensee, or another person;
(2) fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(3) buys electronic smoking devices for resale:
(i) in violation of a license; or
(ii) from a person [that is not a licensed electronic smoking devices
manufacturer or a licensed electronic smoking devices wholesaler] IN VIOLATION OF §
16.7–211(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) is convicted, under the laws of the United States or of any other state,
of:
(i) a felony; or
(ii) a misdemeanor that is a crime of moral turpitude and is directly
related to the fitness and qualification of the applicant or licensee;
(5) violates federal, State, or local law regarding the sale of electronic
smoking devices; or
(6) violates this title, Title 16, or Title 16.5 of this article or regulations
adopted under these titles.
(b) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 16.7–208 of this subtitle, the Executive
Director shall deny a license to any applicant that has had a license revoked under this
section until:
(1) 1 year has passed since the license was revoked; and
(2) [it] THE APPLICANT satisfactorily [appears] DEMONSTRATES to the
Executive Director that the applicant will comply with this title and any regulations
adopted under this title.

HOUSE BILL 1441
(c) Prior to the issuance or renewal of any license, the Executive Director shall
conduct an investigation with regard to:
(1) the applicant;
(2) the business to be operated; and
(3) the facts set forth in the application.
16.7–213.1.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Maryland Department
of Health or its designee shall conduct at least one unannounced inspection of licensed
retailers or vape shop vendors to ensure the licensee’s compliance with the provisions of
this title and § 10–107 of the Criminal Law Article each year.
(2) If a licensed retailer or vape shop vendor violates any provision of this
title or § 10–107 of the Criminal Law Article, the Maryland Department of Health:
(I) shall conduct an additional unannounced inspection within 180
days after the initial inspection; AND
(II) MAY REFER THE LICENSED RETAILER OR VAPE SHOP
VENDOR TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 16.7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Maryland Department of Health or its designee may use an individual
under the age of 21 years to assist in conducting an inspection under this section.
(c) To determine the location of a licensed retailer or vape shop vendor subject to
an unannounced inspection, the Maryland Department of Health or its designee shall use
the list of licensed retailers or vape shop vendors as of December 31 of the previous calendar
year.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY CONDUCT UNANNOUNCED
INSPECTIONS OF A LICENSEE TO ENSURE THE LICENSEE’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE AND § 10–107 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
SUBTITLE 3. CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES MANUFACTURERS.
16.7–301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1441 11
(B) (1) “BRAND FAMILY” MEANS ALL STYLES AND FLAVORS OF
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES SOLD UNDER THE SAME TRADEMARK, REGARDLESS
OF WHETHER THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES ARE DIFFERENTIATED FROM
ONE ANOTHER BY MEANS OF ADDITIONAL MODIFIERS OR DESCRIPTORS DEPICTING
FLAVORS, SHAPES, METHOD OF DELIVERY, DEVICE MODEL, POTENCY, NICOTINE
LEVEL, OR ANY OTHER DIFFERENTIATION.
(2) “BRAND FAMILY” INCLUDES ANY USE OF A BRAND NAME,
TRADEMARK, LOGO, SYMBOL, MOTTO, SELLING MESSAGE, RECOGNIZABLE PATTERN
OF COLORS, OR ANY OTHER INDICIA OF PRODUCT IDENTIFICATION IDENTICAL OR
SIMILAR TO OR IDENTIFIABLE WITH A PREVIOUSLY KNOWN BRAND OF ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES, OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE
PRODUCTS.
(C) “BRAND STYLE” MEANS EACH INDIVIDUAL STYLE OR FLAVOR OF AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE SOLD WITHIN A BRAND FAMILY, BUT
DIFFERENTIATED FROM ONE ANOTHER BY MEANS OF ADDITIONAL ADJECTIVES,
MODIFIERS, OR DESCRIPTORS, INCLUDING THOSE DEPICTING FLAVORS, SHAPES,
METHOD OF DELIVERY, DEVICE MODEL, POTENCY, OR NICOTINE LEVEL.
(D) “DIRECTORY” MEANS THE LIST PUBLISHED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OF APPROVED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURERS THAT
HAVE SUBMITTED A CERTIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE AND THE
BRAND FAMILIES AND BRAND STYLES OF THEIR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
THAT HAVE BEEN DETERMINED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AS CONFORMING TO
THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 16.7–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
16.7–302.
(A) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER WHOSE
PRODUCTS ARE SOLD IN THE STATE SHALL EXECUTE AND DELIVER, ON A FORM
PRESCRIBED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, A CERTIFICATION TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL NOT LATER THAN JUNE 30 EACH YEAR.
(B) IN THE CERTIFICATION SUBMITTED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER
SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY ALL OF ITS ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE BRAND
FAMILIES THAT ARE BEING SOLD IN THE UNITED STATES AS OF THE DATE OF
CERTIFICATION;

HOUSE BILL 1441
(2) IDENTIFY ANY ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES BRAND FAMILY
THAT THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SEEKS TO SELL IN THE
STATE IN THE UPCOMING FISCAL YEAR;
(3) INDICATE WITH AN ASTERISK ANY BRAND FAMILY SOLD IN THE
STATE DURING THE PRECEDING 3 CALENDAR YEARS THAT IS NO LONGER SOLD IN
THE STATE AS OF THE DATE OF CERTIFICATION;
(4) IF A BRAND FAMILY INCLUDED IN THE CERTIFICATION WAS MADE
BY ANOTHER MANUFACTURER IN THE PRECEDING 3 CALENDAR YEARS, IDENTIFY BY
NAME AND ADDRESS THE OTHER MANUFACTURER;
(5) INDICATE WHETHER THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES BRAND
FAMILY AND BRAND STYLE BEING CERTIFIED INCLUDES AN AEROSOLIZING DEVICE
OR THE VAPING LIQUID, NICOTINE SALT, OR OTHER CONSUMABLE SUBSTANCE TO
BE AEROSOLIZED OR BOTH;
(6) PROVIDE IMAGES, SPECIFICATIONS, OR OTHER
REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SHAPE, DESIGN, LABELING AND PACKAGING, AND A
SAMPLE OF EACH ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE FOR EACH BRAND FAMILY
INCLUDED IN THE CERTIFICATION;
(7) PROVIDE THE MARKETING, ADVERTISING, AND SOCIAL MEDIA
PLANS OR OTHER MATERIALS FOR EACH BRAND FAMILY INCLUDED IN THE
CERTIFICATION;
(8) PROVIDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION NECESSARY TO ENABLE THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE
BRAND FAMILIES AND BRAND STYLES BEING CERTIFIED ARE INTENDED TO APPEAL
TO YOUTH, DISGUISE OR MISREPRESENT THE NATURE OF THE PRODUCT, CLAIM IN
ANY WAY THAT THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE IS A SMOKING CESSATION
PRODUCT OR NICOTINE REPLACEMENT THERAPY, OR OTHERWISE DECEIVE
CONSUMERS; AND
(9) IDENTIFY ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL TO CONFIRM THAT THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER AND ITS BRAND FAMILIES AND BRAND STYLES ARE IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS TITLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAWS.
(C) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SHALL FURTHER
CERTIFY THAT THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER:

HOUSE BILL 1441 13
(1) IS REGISTERED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE OR HAS
APPOINTED A RESIDENT AGENT FOR SERVICE OF PROCESS AND PROVIDED NOTICE
OF THE APPOINTMENT AS REQUIRED UNDER § 16.7–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IS LICENSED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO OPERATE AS AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER IN THE STATE; AND
(3) IS IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE LOCAL, STATE,
AND FEDERAL LAWS REGARDING THE MANUFACTURE AND SALE OF ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES.
(D) (1) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER MAY NOT
INCLUDE A BRAND FAMILY OR BRAND STYLE IN ITS CERTIFICATION UNLESS IT
AFFIRMS UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT:
(I) IT IS THE ENTITY THAT FABRICATES, MANUFACTURES,
MIXES, OR OTHERWISE PRODUCES THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES INCLUDED
IN THE CERTIFICATION; AND
(II) TO THE BEST OF THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER’S KNOWLEDGE, NO OTHER ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER IS FABRICATING, MANUFACTURING, MIXING, OR OTHERWISE
PRODUCING ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES FOR SALE IN THE UNITED STATES
WITH THE SAME BRAND NAME AS A BRAND FAMILY INCLUDED IN THE
CERTIFICATION.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED AS LIMITING OR
OTHERWISE AFFECTING THE STATE’S RIGHT TO REFUSE TO INCLUDE AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE ON THE DIRECTORY IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A BRAND FAMILY OR BRAND STYLE INCLUDED IN A
CERTIFICATION IS AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE PRODUCED BY A DIFFERENT
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT HAS NOT PREVIOUSLY
SUBMITTED A CERTIFICATION WITH THE STATE OR THAT IS NOT LISTED IN THE
DIRECTORY MAY SUBMIT AN INITIAL CERTIFICATION WITH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL AT ANY POINT DURING THE YEAR.
(2) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT
SUBMITS AN INITIAL CERTIFICATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MUST SUBMIT AN ANNUAL CERTIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE INITIAL CERTIFICATION WAS SUBMITTED WITHIN 90

HOUSE BILL 1441
DAYS OF THE DATE THE ANNUAL SUBMISSION IS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION.
(F) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER LISTED ON THE
DIRECTORY SHALL UPDATE ITS LISTING ON THE DIRECTORY TO REFLECT ANY
MATERIAL CHANGES TO ITS CERTIFICATION, INCLUDING A CHANGE IN
MANUFACTURING FACILITY OR AN ADDITION TO, A DISCONTINUANCE FROM, OR A
MODIFICATION OF ITS LISTED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE BRAND FAMILIES OR
BRAND STYLES BY EXECUTING AND DELIVERING A SUPPLEMENTAL CERTIFICATION
TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL NOT LESS THAN 30 CALENDAR DAYS PRIOR TO THE
CHANGE.
(G) (1) FOR EACH CERTIFICATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SHALL PAY
TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL A FEE OF $1,000 FOR EACH ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICE BRAND STYLE THE MANUFACTURER IS APPLYING TO INCLUDE IN THE
DIRECTORY UNDER § 16.7–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REVENUES FROM THE CERTIFICATION FEE ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL
FUND TO BE USED BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR ENFORCEMENT
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
16.7–303.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) AND (2) OF THIS SECTION,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC
INSPECTION A DIRECTORY LISTING ALL ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURERS THAT HAVE PROVIDED CURRENT AND ACCURATE
CERTIFICATIONS COMPLYING WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 16.7–302 OF THIS
SUBTITLE AND ALL APPROVED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE BRAND FAMILIES AND
BRAND STYLES INCLUDED IN THE CERTIFICATIONS.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT INCLUDE OR RETAIN ON THE
DIRECTORY ANY BRAND FAMILIES OR BRAND STYLES OF ANY ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE REQUIRED CERTIFICATION
OR FEE OR WHOSE CERTIFICATION THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES IS NOT
IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 16.7–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE, UNLESS THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL HAS DETERMINED THAT THE DEFICIENCY HAS BEEN CURED TO THE
SATISFACTION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL UPDATE THE DIRECTORY AS
NECESSARY TO CORRECT MISTAKES AND TO ADD OR REMOVE AN ELECTRONIC

HOUSE BILL 1441 15
SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER OR ANY BRAND FAMILY OR BRAND STYLE OF AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE TO KEEP THE DIRECTORY IN CONFORMITY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) EACH LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
DISTRIBUTOR AND LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
IMPORTER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND UPDATE AS
NECESSARY, CURRENT CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING
ANY NOTIFICATIONS THAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING A
POINT OF CONTACT PERSON, A PHYSICAL LOCATION, AND AN E–MAIL ADDRESS.
(C) AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER, AN ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR, AND AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES WHOLESALER IMPORTER SHALL MAINTAIN ALL INVOICES AND
DOCUMENTATION OF SALES, ALL APPROVAL LETTERS AND UNDERLYING
APPLICATIONS AND MATERIALS, AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION RELIED ON FOR ITS
CERTIFICATION FOR A MINIMUM PERIOD OF 5 YEARS, UNLESS OTHERWISE
REQUIRED BY LAW TO MAINTAIN THEM FOR A GREATER PERIOD OF TIME.
(D) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, POSSESS FOR SALE IN THE
STATE, OR IMPORT FOR PERSONAL CONSUMPTION IN THE STATE, ANY:
(1) ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE, BRAND FAMILY, OR BRAND STYLE
NOT INCLUDED ON THE DIRECTORY; OR
(2) ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURED BY AN
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT IS NOT INCLUDED ON THE
DIRECTORY.
(E) ANY ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE, BRAND FAMILY, OR BRAND STYLE
NOT INCLUDED ON THE DIRECTORY:
(1) SHALL BE DEEMED CONTRABAND UNDER §§ 13–836, 13–837, AND
13–839 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE PURCHASED OR SOLD IN THE STATE; AND
(3) MAY BE SUBJECT TO SEIZURE, FORFEITURE, AND DISPOSAL.
16.7–304.
(A) (1) ANY NONRESIDENT OR FOREIGN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER THAT HAS NOT REGISTERED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE AS A

HOUSE BILL 1441
FOREIGN CORPORATION OR BUSINESS ENTITY SHALL APPOINT, AND CONTINUALLY
ENGAGE WITHOUT INTERRUPTION, THE SERVICES OF AN AGENT IN THE STATE TO
ACT AS AN AGENT FOR THE SERVICE OF PROCESS ON THE NONRESIDENT OR
FOREIGN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER BEFORE ITS BRAND
FAMILIES OR BRAND STYLES MAY BE INCLUDED OR RETAINED ON THE DIRECTORY
DESCRIBED IN § 16.7–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ANY PROCESS AND ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING AGAINST A
NONRESIDENT OR FOREIGN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER
CONCERNING OR ARISING OUT OF THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE OR THIS
ARTICLE MAY BE SERVED IN ANY MANNER AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(3) (I) THE SERVICE OF PROCESS ON THE DESIGNATED AGENT
SHALL CONSTITUTE LEGAL AND VALID SERVICE OF PROCESS ON THE ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER.
(II) THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER
SHALL PROVIDE, TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE NAME, ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND PROOF OF
THE APPOINTMENT AND AVAILABILITY OF THE AGENT TO THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) (1) THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SHALL
PROVIDE:
(I) NOTICE TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL NOT LESS THAN 30 CALENDAR DAYS PRIOR TO THE TERMINATION OF THE
AUTHORITY OF AN AGENT; AND
(II) PROOF TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
OF THE APPOINTMENT OF A NEW AGENT NOT LESS THAN 5 CALENDAR DAYS PRIOR
TO THE TERMINATION OF AN EXISTING AGENT APPOINTMENT.
(2) IF AN AGENT TERMINATES AN AGENCY APPOINTMENT, THE
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OF THE TERMINATION WITHIN 5 CALENDAR DAYS; AND
(II) INCLUDE PROOF TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OF THE APPOINTMENT OF A NEW AGENT.
16.7–305.

HOUSE BILL 1441 17
(A) (1) NOT LATER THAN 21 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH CALENDAR
MONTH, OR OTHER REPORTING PERIOD ESTABLISHED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
EACH LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR AND
LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT ALSO HOLDS A
LICENSE TO ACT AS AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES RETAILER OR VAPE SHOP
VENDOR SHALL SUBMIT TRUE AND ACCURATE INFORMATION IN THE FORM AND
MANNER THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REQUIRES TO FACILITATE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING A LIST BY BRAND FAMILY AND BRAND STYLE OF THE
TOTAL QUANTITY OF ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES SOLD DURING THE
REPORTING PERIOD BY THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR TO:
(I) A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES RETAILER OR
LICENSED VAPE SHOP VENDOR; OR
(II) THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER THAT ALSO HOLDS A LICENSE TO ACT AS AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES RETAILER OR VAPE SHOP VENDOR.
(2) A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER
DISTRIBUTOR OR LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT
ALSO HOLDS A LICENSE TO ACT AS AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES RETAILER OR
VAPE SHOP VENDOR SHALL MAINTAIN AND MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND THE COMPTROLLER FOR A PERIOD OF 5
YEARS ALL INVOICES AND DOCUMENTATION OF SALES OF ALL ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION RELIED ON IN REPORTING TO
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND THE COMPTROLLER.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY DISCLOSE TO THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND THE COMPTROLLER ANY INFORMATION RECEIVED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE AND REQUESTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE COMPTROLLER
FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING COMPLIANCE WITH AND ENFORCEMENT OF
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, ONLY FOR PURPOSES OF ENFORCEMENT OF THIS TITLE OR
CORRESPONDING LAWS OF OTHER STATES:
(I) SHALL SHARE WITH EACH OTHER THE INFORMATION
RECEIVED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR TITLE 11 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1441
(II) MAY SHARE THE INFORMATION WITH OTHER FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL AGENCIES.
(C) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE
SUBMITTED BY LAW, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
REQUIRE A LICENSEE TO SUBMIT ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION, INCLUDING
INVOICES, RECEIPTS, CORRESPONDENCE, CONFIRMATIONS OF APPROVAL,
MARKETING, ADVERTISING MATERIALS, AND SAMPLES OF PACKAGING OR LABELING
OF EACH BRAND FAMILY, AS IS NECESSARY TO ENABLE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
DETERMINE WHETHER A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE AND ALL OTHER
APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAWS.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE
COMPTROLLER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS REQUIRING A LICENSEE TO SUBMIT ANY
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OR DOCUMENTATION AS NECESSARY TO DETERMINE
THE ACCURACY OF ANY INFORMATION SUBMITTED OR OTHERWISE PROMOTE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
16.7–306.
(A) (1) BEFORE INCLUSION ON THE DIRECTORY UNDER § 16.7–303 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER
SHALL DEPOSIT AND MAINTAIN $75,000 IN AN ESCROW FUND ESTABLISHED AT A
FEDERALLY OR STATE CHARTERED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION AND GOVERNED BY A
QUALIFIED ESCROW AGREEMENT THAT HAS BEEN REVIEWED AND APPROVED BY
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY AUTHORIZE A REDUCTION OF THE
AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE DEPOSITED INTO A QUALIFIED ESCROW FUND BY A
LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER OF UP TO $50,000 IF
THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE BRAND FAMILIES AND BRAND STYLES
INCLUDED IN THE MANUFACTURER’S CERTIFICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE HAVE RECEIVED A FINAL MARKETING ORDER AND ARE AUTHORIZED BY
THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.
(B) A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT
PLACES FUNDS INTO ESCROW IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL RECEIVE THE INTEREST OR OTHER APPRECIATION ON THE FUNDS
AS EARNED.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY RELEASE THE FUNDS FROM ESCROW
ONLY TO:

HOUSE BILL 1441 19
(1) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO SATISFY ANY UNPAID COSTS
ARISING OUT OF THE COLLECTION, SEIZURE, STORAGE, DISPOSAL, OR OTHER
ENFORCEMENT COSTS RESULTING FROM A VIOLATION OF AN APPLICABLE FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL LAW BY THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER; OR
(2) A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER IF
THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER:
(I) ELECTS TO CEASE SELLING ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
IN THE STATE;
(II) DEMONSTRATES TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL THAT THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER
HAS REMOVED ALL BRAND FAMILIES AND BRAND STYLES MANUFACTURED BY THE
LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER FROM THE STATE; AND
(III) APPLIES TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR A RELEASE OF
THE FUNDS IN ESCROW.
(D) (1) EACH LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER THAT PLACES FUNDS INTO ESCROW IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL ANNUALLY CERTIFY TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL THAT IT IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL NOTIFIES A LICENSED ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER THAT THE AMOUNT IN ESCROW HAS FALLEN
BELOW THE APPLICABLE AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER SHALL
BRING THE AMOUNT IN ESCROW INTO COMPLIANCE WITHIN 15 DAYS.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION ON BEHALF
OF THE STATE AGAINST ANY LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER THAT FAILS TO PLACE INTO ESCROW THE FUNDS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) (I) A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER THAT FAILS TO PLACE INTO ESCROW THE FUNDS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE REQUIRED WITHIN 15 DAYS TO PLACE
SUCH FUNDS INTO ESCROW SO AS TO BRING THE MANUFACTURER INTO
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1441
(II) EACH DAY THAT A LICENSED ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES MANUFACTURER IS LISTED ON THE DIRECTORY AND HAS LESS THAN THE
AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE MAINTAINED IN AN ESCROW ACCOUNT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(III) THE COURT, ON A FINDING OF A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY TO BE PAID TO THE GENERAL
FUND OF THE STATE OF $500 FOR EACH DAY OF EACH VIOLATION.
16.7–307.
(A) A DETERMINATION BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO OMIT OR TO
DELETE FROM THE DIRECTORY DESCRIBED IN § 16.7–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE A
BRAND FAMILY, A BRAND STYLE, OR AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT REMOVE A BRAND FAMILY, A
BRAND STYLE, OR AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER FROM THE
DIRECTORY UNTIL AT LEAST 15 DAYS AFTER THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER IS GIVEN NOTICE OF THE INTENDED ACTION.
(2) NOTICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUFFICIENT AND
SHALL BE DEEMED RECEIVED BY AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
MANUFACTURER IF THE NOTICE IS SENT ELECTRONICALLY TO THE ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER’S E–MAIL ADDRESS FROM THE MOST RECENT
CERTIFICATION FILED, TO THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER’S
ADDRESS FROM THE MOST RECENT CERTIFICATION FILED, OR TO THE
MANUFACTURER’S REGISTERED AGENT FOR SERVICE OF PROCESS IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REMOVES A BRAND FAMILY, A
BRAND STYLE, OR AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE FROM THE DIRECTORY, EACH
LICENSED RETAILER AND LICENSED VAPE SHOP VENDOR SHALL HAVE 15 DAYS TO
REMOVE THE PRODUCT FROM ITS INVENTORY AND RETURN THE PRODUCT TO THE
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER FOR DISPOSAL.
(2) AFTER 15 DAYS FOLLOWING THE REMOVAL OF A BRAND FAMILY,
A BRAND STYLE, OR AN ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE FROM THE DIRECTORY, THE
PRODUCT:
(I) SHALL BE DEEMED CONTRABAND UNDER §§ 13–836,
13–837, AND 13–839 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1441 21
(II) MAY NOT BE PURCHASED OR SOLD IN THE STATE; AND
(III) MAY BE SUBJECT TO SEIZURE, FORFEITURE, AND DISPOSAL.
(D) IN ANY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE STATE TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE,
THE STATE SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECOVER THE COSTS OF SEIZURE, STORAGE,
AND DISPOSAL, EXPERT WITNESS FEES, COSTS OF THE ACTION, AND REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(E) (1) IF A COURT OR OTHER ADJUDICATIVE BODY DETERMINES THAT A
PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT OR OTHER ADJUDICATIVE BODY
SHALL ORDER ANY PROFITS, GAIN, GROSS RECEIPTS, OR OTHER BENEFIT FROM THE
VIOLATION TO BE PAID TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) UNLESS OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED, THE REMEDIES OR
PENALTIES PROVIDED BY THIS SUBTITLE ARE CUMULATIVE TO EACH OTHER AND TO
THE REMEDIES OR PENALTIES AVAILABLE UNDER ALL OTHER LAWS OF THE STATE.
16.7–308.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
16.7–309.
(A) IN ADDITION TO OR INSTEAD OF ANY OTHER CIVIL OR CRIMINAL
REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW:
(1) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 16.7–208 OF THIS
TITLE, ON A DETERMINATION THAT A LICENSEE HAS VIOLATED § 16.7–303(D) OF
THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE, OR A LICENSED
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES WHOLESALER DISTRIBUTOR OR LICENSED
ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES MANUFACTURER HAS VIOLATED § 16.7–305(A) OF
THIS SUBTITLE, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY IN AN
AMOUNT NOT EXCEEDING THE GREATER OF:
(I) 500% OF THE RETAIL VALUE OF THE ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES THAT ARE THE SUBJECT OF THE VIOLATION; OR
(II) $5,000; AND
(2) ON A DETERMINATION THAT A LICENSEE HAS COMMITTED A
SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER A VIOLATION OF § 16.7–303(D) OR

HOUSE BILL 1441
§ 16.7–305(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE,
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY REVOKE OR SUSPEND THE LICENSE OF THE
LICENSEE IN THE MANNER PROVIDED UNDER § 16.7–209 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) EACH SALE OF AND EACH OFFER TO SELL ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES IN VIOLATION OF § 16.7–303(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL CONSTITUTE A
SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(C) IN ADDITION TO ANY PENALTIES OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW, A
VIOLATION OF § 16.7–303(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, ON THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S OWN
INITIATIVE OR ON BEHALF OF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, MAY SEEK AN
INJUNCTION TO RESTRAIN A THREATENED OR ACTUAL VIOLATION OF § 16.7–303(D)
OR § 16.7–305(A) OR (D) OF THIS SUBTITLE BY A LICENSEE AND COMPEL THE
LICENSEE TO COMPLY WITH THOSE SECTIONS.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON WHO SELLS, DISTRIBUTES, ACQUIRES, HOLDS, OWNS, POSSESSES,
TRANSPORTS, IMPORTS, OR CAUSES TO BE IMPORTED ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES FOR RESALE TO A CONSUMER THAT THE PERSON KNOWS OR SHOULD HAVE
KNOWN ARE INTENDED FOR DISTRIBUTION OR SALE IN THE STATE IN VIOLATION OF
§ 16.7–303(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH.
(2) THE PENALTIES IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT
APPLY TO A PERSON WHO POSSESSES LESS THAN $100 WORTH OF ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES SOLELY FOR PERSONAL CONSUMPTION AND NOT FOR RESALE TO
A CONSUMER.
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:

HOUSE BILL 1441 23
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 16.7–303(D) OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE; OR
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.